Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-417
Distribution of state publications; restriction.

The Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse shall not engage in general public distribution of either state publications or lists of publications. Sections 51-411 to 51-418 shall not affect the distribution of state publications distributed by state agencies, except that the agencies shall deposit in the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse the number of copies of each of their state publications certified by the clearinghouse.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 5.